Hawaii statutes.
PART I.
OPERATION

Law Journals and Reviews

Intextication: Txting Whl Drvng. Does the Punishment Fit
the Crime? 32 UH L. Rev. 359 (2010).

§291-1 [NEW] Definitions. As used in
this part:

"Intoxicating liquor" means the same
as the term is defined in section 281-1.

"Public street, road, or highway"
includes the entire width, including berm or shoulder, of every road, alley,
street, way, lane, trail, highway, bikeway, bridge, when any part thereof is
open for use by the public, including any bicycle lane, bicycle path, bikeway,
controlled-access highway, laned roadway, roadway, or street, as defined in
section 291C-1, and any public highway, as defined in section 264-1.

"Scenic lookout" includes any area
within or adjoining a public street, road, or highway which is intended for use
by motorists as a stopping or parking area attendant to the enjoyment of the
surrounding scenery or a view. [L 1986, c 171, §2; am L 2002, c 16, §14]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next